Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature recognizes the need for regulation of persons and businesses providing health and health-related services and environmental services. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for such regulation through the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 2.